src-fst-root.lexc.md
* @U.VPref2.ZERO@
* @U.VPref2.vos@
* @U.VPref2.te@
* @U.VPref2.ke@
* @U.VPref2.ta@
* @U.VPref2.ty@

* @R.VPref2.ZERO@
* @R.VPref2.vos@
* @R.VPref2.te@
* @R.VPref2.ke@
* @R.VPref2.ta@
* @R.VPref2.ty@

* @D.VPref1.ZERO@
* @D.VPref1.at@
* @D.VPref1.ul@
* @D.VPref2.vos@
* @D.VPref2.te@
* @D.VPref2.ke@
* @D.VPref2.ta@
* @D.VPref2.ty@

# FLAGS USED WITH ERRORS, ORTHOGRAPHIC or others
* @U.ERRORTH.nohyphen@ +Err/Orth-no-hyphen
* @R.ERRORTH.nohyphen@
* @D.ERRORTH.nohyphen@

# FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
## number
* @U.DECL-NX.SG@
* @U.DECL-NX.DU@
* @U.DECL-NX.PL@
* @R.DECL-NX.SG@
* @R.DECL-NX.DU@
* @R.DECL-NX.PL@
* @R.Pref1.at@
* @R.Pref2.ta@
* @R.Pref2.ty@

Removal
* @C.DECL-NX@ 
* @C.DECL-DX@ 
* @C.CX@ 
* @C.VPref@ юил/хот...
* @C.VPref1@ ат
* @C.VPref2@ та/ты
* @C.ERRORTH@

## The basic lexica

**LEXICON Root** 
The word forms in the MANSI language start from the lexeme roots of basic
word classes, or optionally from prefixes:
**Nouns ;** 
**Verbs ;**
**VPrefixes ;**
**Adjectives ;** 
**Adverbs ;** 
**Pronouns ;** 
**Numerals ;** 
**Conjunctions ;** 
**Interjections ;** 
**Participles ;** 
**Postpositions ;** 
**PROP_MANSINAMES ;** mansi-specific proper nouns
**urj-Cyrl-ProperNouns ;** common cyrillic proper nouns
**Punctuation ;** 
**Symbols ;** 
**Abbreviation ;** 

* **LEXICON K** for evt. clitic (goes to #)

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-mns/blob/main/src/fst/root.lexc)</small>

---
